Washington statutes.
RCW 43.85.230

Investment deposits and rate of interest—Term deposit basis.

The state treasurer may deposit moneys not required to meet current demands upon a term deposit basis not to exceed five years at such interest rates and upon such conditions as to withdrawals of such moneys as may be agreed upon between the state treasurer and any qualified public depositary.

[ 1993 c 512 s 32; 1984 c 177 s 20; 1983 c 66 s 19; 1965 c 8 s 43.85.230. Prior: 1955 c 198 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.